Maryland, session 2025, SB0548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
9–101.
(a) In any custody or visitation proceeding, if the court has reasonable grounds to
believe that a child has been abused or neglected by a party to the proceeding, the court
shall determine whether abuse or neglect is likely to occur if custody or visitation rights
are granted to the party.
(b) Unless the court specifically finds that there is no likelihood of further child
abuse or neglect by the party, the court shall deny custody or visitation rights to that party,
except that the court may approve a supervised visitation arrangement that assures the
safety and the physiological, psychological, and emotional well–being of the child.
9–101.1.
(a) In this section, “abuse” has the meaning stated in § 4–501 of this article.
– 1 –

Ch. 484 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) In a custody or visitation proceeding, the court shall consider, when deciding
custody or visitation issues, evidence of abuse by a party against:
(1) the other parent of the party’s child;
(2) the party’s spouse; or
(3) any child residing within the party’s household, including a child other
than the child who is the subject of the custody or visitation proceeding.
(c) If the court finds that a party has committed abuse against the other parent
of the party’s child, the party’s spouse, or any child residing within the party’s household,
the court shall make arrangements for custody or visitation that best protect:
(1) the child who is the subject of the proceeding; and
(2) the victim of the abuse.
9–101.2.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, unless good cause for the
award of custody or visitation is shown by clear and convincing evidence, a court may not
award custody of a child or visitation with a child:
(1) to a parent who has been found by a court of this State to be guilty of
first degree or second degree murder of the other parent of the child, another child of the
parent, or any family member residing in the household of either parent of the child; or
(2) to a parent who has been found by a court of any state or of the United
States to be guilty of a crime that, if committed in this State, would be first degree murder
or second degree murder of the other parent of the child, another child of the parent, or any
family member residing in the household of either parent of the child.
(b) If it is in the best interest of the child, the court may approve a supervised
visitation arrangement that assures the safety and the physiological, psychological, and
emotional well–being of the child.
SUBTITLE 2. LEGAL AND PHYSICAL CUSTODY – JUDICIAL DETERMINATIONS.
9–201.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF §§ 9–101, 9–101.1, AND 9–101.2 OF
THIS TITLE, IN DETERMINING WHAT LEGAL CUSTODY AND PHYSICAL CUSTODY IS IN
THE BEST INTEREST OF A CHILD, THE COURT MAY CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING
FACTORS:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 484
(1) STABILITY AND THE FORESEEABLE HEALTH AND WELFARE OF THE
CHILD;
(2) FREQUENT, REGULAR, AND CONTINUING CONTACT WITH PARENTS
WHO CAN ACT IN THE CHILD’S BEST INTEREST;
(3) WHETHER AND HOW PARENTS WHO DO NOT LIVE TOGETHER WILL
SHARE THE RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF RAISING THE CHILD;
(4) THE CHILD’S RELATIONSHIP WITH EACH PARENT, ANY SIBLINGS,
OTHER RELATIVES, AND INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE OR MAY BECOME IMPORTANT IN THE
CHILD’S LIFE;
(5) THE CHILD’S PHYSICAL AND EMOTIONAL SECURITY AND
PROTECTION FROM EXPOSURE TO CONFLICT AND VIOLENCE;
(6) THE CHILD’S DEVELOPMENTAL NEEDS, INCLUDING PHYSICAL
SAFETY, EMOTIONAL SECURITY, POSITIVE SELF–IMAGE, INTERPERSONAL SKILLS,
AND INTELLECTUAL AND COGNITIVE GROWTH;
(7) THE DAY–TO–DAY NEEDS OF THE CHILD, INCLUDING EDUCATION,
SOCIALIZATION, CULTURE AND RELIGION, FOOD, SHELTER, CLOTHING, AND
MENTAL AND PHYSICAL HEALTH;
(8) HOW TO:
(I) PLACE THE CHILD’S NEEDS ABOVE THE PARENTS’ NEEDS;
(II) PROTECT THE CHILD FROM THE NEGATIVE EFFECTS OF ANY
CONFLICT BETWEEN THE PARENTS; AND
(III) MAINTAIN THE CHILD’S RELATIONSHIP WITH THE PARENTS,
SIBLINGS, OTHER RELATIVES, OR OTHER INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE OR LIKELY MAY
HAVE A SIGNIFICANT RELATIONSHIP WITH THE CHILD;
(9) THE AGE OF THE CHILD;
(10) ANY MILITARY DEPLOYMENT OF A PARENT AND ITS EFFECT, IF
ANY, ON THE PARENT–CHILD RELATIONSHIP;
(11) ANY PRIOR COURT ORDERS OR AGREEMENTS;
(12) EACH PARENT’S ROLE AND TASKS RELATED TO THE CHILD AND
HOW, IF AT ALL, THOSE ROLES AND TASKS HAVE CHANGED;
– 3 –

Ch. 484 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(13) THE LOCATION OF EACH PARENT’S HOME AS IT RELATES TO THE
PARENT’S ABILITY TO COORDINATE PARENTING TIME, SCHOOL, AND ACTIVITIES;
(14) THE PARENTS’ RELATIONSHIP WITH EACH OTHER, INCLUDING:
(I) HOW THEY COMMUNICATE WITH EACH OTHER;
(II) WHETHER THEY CAN CO–PARENT WITHOUT DISRUPTING
THE CHILD’S SOCIAL AND SCHOOL LIFE; AND
(III) HOW THE PARENTS WILL RESOLVE ANY DISPUTES IN THE
FUTURE WITHOUT THE NEED FOR COURT INTERVENTION;
(15) THE CHILD’S PREFERENCE, IF AGE–APPROPRIATE; AND
(16) ANY OTHER FACTOR THAT THE COURT CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE
IN DETERMINING HOW BEST TO SERVE THE PHYSICAL, DEVELOPMENTAL, AND
EMOTIONAL NEEDS OF THE CHILD.
(B) THE COURT SHALL ARTICULATE ITS FINDINGS OF FACT ON THE RECORD
OR IN A WRITTEN OPINION, INCLUDING THE CONSIDERATION OF EACH FACTOR
LISTED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AND ANY OTHER FACTOR THAT THE
COURT CONSIDERED.
9–202.
(A) THE COURT MAY MODIFY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF
THIS SUBTITLE, A CHILD CUSTODY OR VISITATION ORDER IF THE COURT
DETERMINES THAT THERE HAS BEEN A MATERIAL CHANGE IN CIRCUMSTANCES
SINCE THE ISSUANCE OF THE ORDER THAT RELATES TO THE NEEDS OF THE CHILD
OR THE ABILITY OF THE PARENTS TO MEET THOSE NEEDS AND THAT MODIFYING THE
ORDER IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF THE CHILD.
(B) A PARENT’S PROPOSAL TO RELOCATE THE RESIDENCE OF THE PARENT
OR THE CHILD IN A WAY THAT WOULD CAUSE PHYSICAL CUSTODY TO BE
IMPRACTICABLE CONSTITUTES A MATERIAL CHANGE IN CIRCUMSTANCES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 4 –